Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-122.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-122.03. Qualifications for registration; reciprocity or endorsement A. Notwithstanding section 32-122.01, a person who meets the qualifications for registration pursuant to this section is eligible for registration. B. An applicant for professional registration as a professional engineer, architect, land surveyor or landscape architect in this state through reciprocity or endorsement shall hold both of the following: 1. A valid license, registration or certification in the profession in which registration is sought that is issued by the proper authority of either: (a) Another state, territory, district or possession of the united states. (b) A country participating in the applicable profession's national council mutual recognition agreement. 2. A certification or model law designation valid record from the applicable profession's national council certifying that the individual satisfies that national council's requirements for certification, model law designation or mutual recognition agreement. C. In addition to the requirements prescribed by subsection B of this section, an applicant for registration as a: 1. Professional engineer through reciprocity or endorsement shall hold a record from the profession's national council verifying that the person meets at least one of the following in the branch of engineering in which registration is sought: (a) Has at least four years of experience following the person's licensure, registration or certification by the other jurisdiction. (b) Passed a professional national examination. (c) Earned a baccalaureate or equivalent degree or a postgraduate degree. 2. Land surveyor through reciprocity or endorsement shall pass the examination relating to surveying methods and legal principles in this state as prescribed by the board in rule. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.